verb.che.lexd
LEXICON VerbPres
агийта:огуьйту
айдан:айдо
акъдала:акъдолу
акъдийла:акъдуьйлу
акъдовла:акъдовлу
ала:олу
алийта:олуьйту
арийта:оруьйту
артдан:артдо
ата:оту
атийта:отуьйту
аха:оxy
бакъдан:бакъдо
басардан:басардо
бацо:бацабо
бекъийта:боькъуьйту
бехдан:бехдо
боддала:бодло
боддан:боддо
букардола:букардулу
бухабан:бухабо
вазийта:возуьйту
веддала:ведло
веддан:веддо
гамдан:гамдо
гаттадан:гаттадо
гергадало:гергадаладо
гергадан:гергадогӀу
гидолла:гидуллу
гихаа:гихоу
гочдан:гочдо
гӀаддаха:гӀаддоьду
гӀелдан:гӀелдо
гӀepгӀa:гӀepгӀa
гӀоро:гӀорадо*
гӀорто:гӀортадо*
даадайта:даадойту
даадала:даало
дагадаийта:дагадоуьйту
дагадайта:дагадойту
дагадала:дагадолу
дагадала:дагало
дагадан:дагадогӀу
дагадийла:дагадуьйлу
дагазадаккха:дагазадоккху
дагалаца:дагалоцу
дагалацадала:дагалацало
дагардадала:дагардало
дагардан:дагардо
дададайта:дададойту
дададала:дадало
дажо:дажадо
даздала:дазло
даздан:даздо
дайдала:дайло
дайдан:дайдо
даккхадала:даккхало
даккхийден:даккхийдоь
дакхадала:дакхало
дакъадайта:дакъадойту
дакъадала:дакъало
дакъадалийта:дакъадолуьйту
дакъазадаккха:дакъазадоккху
дакъазадаккхийта:дакъазадоккхуьйту
дакъазадала:дакъазадолу
дакъазадалийта:дакъазадолуьйту
дакъазадаха:дакъазадоху
дакъазадахийта:дакъазадохуьйту
дакъазадийла:дакъазадуьйлу
дакъазадийлийта:дакъазадуьйлуьйту
дакъазадовла:дакъазадовлу
даладала:далало
далладайта:далладойту
дарадала:дарало
дардайта:дардойту
дардала:дарло
дардалийта:дардолуьйту
дарийта:доруьйту
дарстадайта:дарстадойту
дарстадала:дарстало
дархадала:дархадолу
дассадайта:дассадойту
дассадала:дассало
дассадалийта:дассадолуьйту
дастадала:дастало
датадала:датало
даттадала:даттало
датӀадайта:датӀадойту
датӀадала:датӀало
датӀийта:дотӀуьйту
датӀо:датӀадо
дахадайта:дахадойту
даханадан:даханадогӀу
дахдайта:дахдойту
дахдан:дахдо
дахкадайта:дахкадойту
дахкадала:дахкало
дахкадалийта:дахкадолуьйту
дахчадала:дахчало
дахьадайта:дахьадойту
дахьадала:дахьало
даца:доцу
дацадайта:дацадойту
дацадала:дацало
дацдайта:дацдойту
дацдала:дацло
дацдалийта:дацдолуьйту
дацдан:дацдо
дацийта:доцуьйту
дацо:дацадо
дашадайта:дашадойту
дашадала:дашало
дашадала:дашало
даӀaдала:даӀало
даьгнадала:даьгнадолу
дебо:дебадо
дегадайта:дегадойту
дегадала:дегало
дегийта:доьгуьйту
дедала:дело
дезадала:дезало
дезаден:дезадоь
дейтадала:дейтало
декадайта:декадойту
декадала:декало
декийта:доькуьйту
декхадала:декхало
декхийта:доькхуьйту
декъадала:декъало
декъалдан:декъалдо
декъийта:доькъуьйту
деладайта:деладойту
деладала:делало
деладалийта:деладолуьйту
делахдала:делахдолу
делахдийла:делахдуьйлу
делахдовла:делахдовлу
делийта:доьлуьту
делладала:деллало
делхадайта:делхадойту
делхадала:делхало
дендайта:дендойту
дендала:денло
дендан:дендо
дерзадайта:дерзадойту
дерзадала:дерзало
дерзинадаккха:дерзинадоккху
дерзинадала:дерзинадолу
дерзинадаха:дерзинадоху
дерзинадийла:дерзинадуьйлу
дерзинадовла:дерзинадовлу
дестадала:дестало
дехьа:дехьа
дехьадаккха:дехьадоккху
дехьадала:дехьадолу
дахьадаха:дехьадоху
дехьадийла:дехьадуьйлу
дехьадовла:дехьадовлу
дигадала:дигало
дижадайта:дижадойту
дижадала:дижало
дийгӀадала:дийгӀало
дийладала:дийлало
дийцадала:дийцало
дийшадайта:дийшадойту
дийшадала:дийшало
диладала:дилало
дилладала:диллало
дицдалийта:дицдолуьйту
дицдан:дицдо
довдадала:довдало
довзадала:довзало
довладала:довлало
дожийта:дужуьйту
дозадала:дозало
дозийта:дузуьйту
доккхадедан:доккхадедо
доккхаден:доккхадоь
доладайта:доладойту
доладала:долало
доладалийта:доладолуьйту
доссадайта:доссадойту
доссадала:доссало
доттадала:доттало
дохадайта:дохадойту
дохадала:дохало
дохдайта:дохдойту
дохдала:дохло
дохдалийта:дохдолуьйту
дохдан:дохдо
дохийта:духуьйту
дохкадала:дохкало
дохкодаккха:дохкодоккху
дохкодала:дохкодолу
дохкодаха:дохкодоху
дохкодийла:дохкодуьйлу
дохкодовла:дохкодовлу
дохо:дохадо
дузадайта:дузадойту
дузадала:дузало
дукъадала:дукъало
дукъдайта:дукъдойту
дукъдала:дукъло
дукъдалийта:дукъдолуьйту
дукъдан:дукъдо
дуладала:дулало
дулийта:дулуьйту
дурдайта:дурдойту
дурдала:дурло
дурдалийта:дурдолуьйту
дурдан:дурдо
дусадала:дусало
дусийта:дусуьйту
дустадала:дустало
дуткъадайта:дуткъадойту
дуткъадала:дуткъало
дуткъадалийта:дуткъадолуьйту
дуткъадан:дуткъадо
духаала:духаолу
духаарахеца:духаарахоьцу
духааха:духаоху
духадагардан:духадагардо
духадаккха:духадоккху
духадала:духало
духадала:духадолу
духадала:духало
духадан:духадо
духадан:духадогӀу
духадара:духадору
духадаха:духадоьду
духадахадала:духадахало
духадахадала:духадахало
духадахийта:духадохуьйту
духадахка:духадохку
духадекъа:духадоькъу
духадерза:духадоьрзу
духадерзо:духадерзадо
духадетта:духадетта
духадийла:духадуьйлу
духадилла:духадуьллу
духадита:духадуьту
духадитта:духадуьтту
духадовла:духадовду
духадожа:духадужу
духадохка:духадухку
духадохка:духадухку
духадуста:духадусту
духакего:духакегадо
духалара:духалору
духалера:духалоьру
духаоза:духаузу
духатега:духатоьгу
духатоха:духатуху
духахьадаккха:духахьадоккху
духахьадала:духахьадолу
духахьадаха:духахьадоху
духахьадийла:духахьадуьйлу
духахьадовла:духахьадовлу
духахьежа:духахьоьжу
духдаккха:духдоккху
духдала:духдолу
духдаха:духдоху
духдийла:духдуьйлу
духдовла:духдовлу
духийта:духуьйту
дуцадала:дуцало
дуцийта:дуцуьйту
дуьйладала:дуьйлало
дуьхьалдаккха:дуьхьалдокху
дуьхьалдала:дуьхьалдолу
дуьхьалдаха:дуьхьалдоху
дуьхьалдерза:дуьхьалдоьрзу
дуьхьалдетта:дуьхьалдетта
дуьхьалдеттадала:дуьхьалдеттало
дуьхьалдийла:дуьхьалдуьйлу
дуьхьалдовла:дуьхьалдовлу
дӀадада:дӀадоду
дӀадайа:дӀадойу
дӀадаккха:дӀадоккху
дӀадаккхийта:дӀадоккхуьйту
дӀадала:дӀало
дӀадан:дӀадогӀу
дӀадаста:дӀадосту
дӀадаха:дӀадоьду
дӀадаха:дӀадоху
дӀадахдан:дӀадахдо
дӀадахка:дӀадохку
дӀадахьа:дӀахьо
дӀаделла:дӀадоьллу
дӀадерза:дӀадоьрзу
дӀадерзо:дӀадерзадо
дӀадига:дӀадуьгу
дӀадилла:дӀадуьллу
дӀадовда:дӀадовду
дӀадожа:дӀадужу
дӀадоладала:дӀадолало
дӀадолла:дӀадуллу
дӀадоло:дӀадоладо
дӀадотта:дӀадутту
дӀадуста:дӀадусту
дӀакхоссадала:дӀакхоссало
дӀанисдан:дӀанисдо
дӀасхьадаржа:дӀасхьадаьржа
дӀасхьадаржо:дӀасхьадаржадо
дӀасхьадахьа:дӀасхьахьо
дӀасхьадекъа:дӀасхьадоькъу
дӀасхьадовла:дӀасхьадовлу
дӀасхьадоа:дӀасхьадуху
дӀасхьаийза:дӀасхьауьйзу
дӀасхьахьовзадала:дӀасхьахьовзало
дӀатакха:дӀатекха
дӀатакха:дӀатокху
дӀатардала:дӀатарло
дӀатардан:дӀатардо
дӀатасадала:дӀатасало
дӀатекха:дӀатекха
дӀатекха:дӀатоькху
дӀахьедан:дӀахьедо
дӀахьийса:дӀахьуьйсу
дӀахьулдан:дӀахьулдо
дӀашардан:дӀашардо
дӀаяздан:дӀаяздо
ега:ега
егаяйта:егайойту
егаяла:егало
его:егайо
еза:еза
езаяла:езало
ека:ека
екаяйта:екайойту
еко:екайо
екхаяла:екхало
екъаяла:екъало
елаяйта:елайойту
елаяла:елало
еха:йоьху
ехка:йоьхку
ехьа:ехьа
ешаяла:ешало
еяла:ело
жимдан:жимдо
зен:зоь
ийдан:ийдо
ирдан:ирдо
йийшаяйта:йийшайойту
йодийта:юдуьйту
йозийта:юзуьйту
йолийта:юлуьйту
йохийта:юхуьйту
кагдан:кагдо
када:кеда
карадало:карадаладо
карадан:карадогӀу
карадаха:карадоьду
карадерза:карадоьрзу
карадерзадайта:карадерзадойту
карадилла:карадуьллу
каро:карадо
карча:керча
карчо:карчадо*
катоха:катуху
качдан:качдо
каяла:кайолу
кегдан:кегдо
кего:кегадо*
керстдан:керстдо
керчо:керчадо*
кечдан:кечдо
когадаха:когадоьду
кхаба:кхобу
кхабийта:кхобуьйту
кхагардола:кхагардулу
кхада:кходу
кхадийта:кходуьйту
кхаза:кхозу
кхазийта:кхозуьйту
кхайкха:кхойкху
кхайкхийта:кхойкхуьйту
кхайкхо:кхайкхадо*
кхала:кхолу
кхалийта:кхолуьйту
кхалла:кхоллу
кхаллийта:кхоллуьйту
кхалха:кхелха
кхалхийта:кхолхуьйту
кхалхо:кхалхадо*
кхарда:кхаьрда
кхардийта:кхордуьйту
кхардо:кхардадо*
кхарза:кхорзу
кхарзийта:кхарзуьйту
кхарста:кхерста
кхарстийта:кхорстуьйту
кхачадала:кхачало
кхачийта:кхочуьйту
кхерийта:кхоьруьйту
кхеро:кхерадо*
кхерста:кхерста
кхерстийта:кхоьрстуьйту
кхерсто:кхерстадо*
кхета:кхета
кхетийта:кхоьтуьйту
кхето:кхетадо*
кхехкийта:кхоьхкуьйту
кхехьа:кхоьхьу
кхехьийта:кхоьхьуьйту
кхиа:кхуьу
кхиийта:кхуьуьйту
кхийда:кхуьйду
кхийдо:кхийдадо*
кхийла:кхуьйлу
кхийса:кхуьйсу
кхийсадала:кхийсало
кхийсийта:кхуьйсуьйту
кхио:кхиадо*
кхоадайта:кхоадойту
кховда:кхевда
кховдийта:кховдуьйту
кховдо:кховдадо*
кховса:кховсу
кхола:кхулу
кхолла:кхуллу
кхоллийта:кхуллуьйту
кхоло:кхоладо
кхоо:кхоадо*
кхосса:кхуссу
кхоссадала:кхоссало
кхоссийта:кхуссуьйту
кхохка:кхухку
кхохкийта:кхухкуьйту
кхохко:кхохкадо*
кхочушдан:кхочушдо
къага:къега
къагийта:къогуьйту
къаго:къагадо*
къада:къеда
къадийта:къодуьйту
къадо:къададо*
къажа:къежа
къаждан:къаждо
къажийта:къожуьйту
къайладаккха:къайладоккху
къайладала:къайладолу
къайладаха:къайладоьду
къайладахийта:къайладохуьйту
къайладахийта:къайладохуьйту
къайладийла:къайладуьйлу
къайладийлийта:къайладуьйлуьйту
къайладовла:къайладовлу
къайладовлийта:къайладовлуьйту
къандан:къандо
къардан:къардо
къарза:къаьрза
къарздан:къарздо
къарзийта:къорзуьйту
къарзо:къарзадо*
къаста:къаьста
къастийта:къостуьйту
къасто:къастадо*
къахета:къахета
къахетийта:къахоьтуьйту
къахка:къаьхка
къахкадайта:къахкадойту
къахкийта:къохкуьйту
къахко:къахкадо*
къахьдан:къахьдо
къахьега:къахьоьгу
къахьегийта:къахьогуьйту
къегийта:къоьгуьйту
къедадала:къедало
къедала:къела
къедийта:къоьдуьйту
къежа:къежа
къеждан:къеждо
къежийта:къоьжуьйту
къекъа:къекъа
къекъийта:къоькъуьйту
къерза:къерза
къерзийта:къоьрзуьйту
къерзо:къерзадо*
къеста:къеста
къестийта:къоьстуьйту
къесто:къестадо*
къехка:къехка
къехкийта:къоьхкуьйту
къехко:къехкадо*
къийдан:къийдо
къийзо:къийзадо*
къийла:къуьйлу
къийлийта:къуьйлуьйту
къийса:къуьйсу
къийсадала:къийсало
къийсийта:къуьйсуьйту
къобалдан:къобалдо
къовзо:къовзадо*
къовкъа:къевкъа
къовкъийта:къовкъуьйту
къовла:къовлу
къовлийта:къовлуьйту
къовса:къовсу
къовсийта:къовсуьйту
къондан:къондо
къордан:къордо
къурдйола:къурдъюлу
кӀаддан:кӀаддо
кӀажардаха:кӀажардоьду
кӀаждаха:кӀаждоьду
кӀайдан:кӀайдо
кӀамдан:кӀамдо
кӀаргдан:кӀаргдо
кӀегардан:кӀегардогӀу
кӀегардаха:кӀегардоьду
кӀегардахьа:кӀегархьо
кӀегарлалла:кӀегарлоллу
кӀегархийшо:кӀегархийшадо
кӀелдан:кӀелдогӀу
кӀелдаха:кӀелдоьду
кӀелдетта:кӀелдетта
кӀодан:кӀодо
кӀордо:кӀордадо*
лаа:лаьа
лагӀдан:лагӀдо
ладийгӀийта:ладуьйгӀуьйту
ладогӀа:ладугӀу
ладогӀийта:ладугӀуьйту
лаза:лозу
лазийта:лозуьйту
лазо:лазадо*
лаийта:лоуьйту
лайта:лойту
лакхийта:локхуьйту
лакъа:лекъа
лакьийта:локъуьйту
лакъо:лакъадо*
лала:лела
лалийта:лолуьйту
лалла:лоллу
лаллийта:лоллуьйту
лало:лаладо*
лара:лору
ларгийта:лоргуьйту
латийта:лотуьйту
латкъа:леткъа
латкъийта:лоткъуьйту
лато:латадо*
латтийта:лоттуьйту
латто:латтадо*
лахийта:лохуьйту
лахка:лохку
лахкийта:лохкуьйту
лахьо:лахьадо*
лашкадала:лашкадолу
лаӀа:лоӀу
лега:лега
ледан:ледо
лелха:лелха
лелхийта:лоьлхуйту
лелхо:лелхадо*
лепа:лепа
лепийта:лоьпуьйту
лепо:лепадо*
лера:лоьру
лерийта:лоьруьйту
леста:леста
лестийта:лоьстуьйту
лесто:лестадо*
лета:лета
летийта:лоьтуьйту
леткъа:леткъа
леткъийта:лоьткъуьйту
лето:летадо*
леха:лоьху
лехийта:лоьхуьйту
лехка:лоьхку
лехкийта:лоьхкуьйту
лехьо:лехьадо*
леца:лоьцу
лецийта:лоьцуьйту
лечкъа:лечкъа
лечкъийта:лоьчкъуьйту
лечкъо:лечкъадо*
леша:леша
леӀа:леӀа
леӀийта:лоьӀуьйту
лийза:луьйзу
лийсийта:луьйсуьйту
лийча:луьйчу
лийчийта:луьйчуьйту
лийчо:лийчадо*
листа:луьсту
листийта:луьстуьйту
литтийта:луьттуьйту
ловса:ловсу
ловсадала:ловсало
ловсардола:ловсардулу
лурдола:лурдулу
мага:мега
магийта:могуьйту
маго:магадо*
маддан:маддо
маждан:маждо
мазакъдола:мазакъдуьлу
макхдала:макхло
макхдан:макхдо
мала:молу
маладала:малало
малдала:малло
малдан:малдо
малийта:молуьйту
маргӀалдола:маргӀалдулу
марздан:марздо
матардола:матардулу
мацдан:мацдо
меттадан:меттадогӀу
мурдола:мурдулу
мустдала:мустло
мустдан:мустдо
муцӀадола:муцӀадулу
нисдан:нисдо
ношдала:ношло
озийта:узуьйту
олла:уллу
оллийта:уллуьйту
олло:олладо*
охкийта:ухкуьйту
охко:охкадо*
охьа:ухьу
охьадаийта:охьадоуьйту
охьадан:охьадогӀу
охьадаха:охьадоьду
охьийта:ухьуьйту
пошмадола:пошмадулу
этӀа:этӀа
ятӀа:етӀа
Iеxо:Iехадо*
аа:оу[agr]
ага:огу[agr]
ага:огу[agr]
агийта:огуьйту[agr]
агийта:огуьиту[agr]
аго:агадо[agr]
ада:оду[agr]
адала:ало[agr]
ажа:ежа[agr]
аза:озу[agr]
азо:азадо[agr]
аийта:оуьйту[agr]
айа:ойу[agr]
айта:ойту[agr]
аккха:оккху[agr]
аккхийта:оккхуьйту[agr]
акха:екха[agr]
акхийта:окхуьйту[agr]
акхо:акхадо[agr]
акъо:акъадо[agr]
ала:олу[agr]
алийта:олуьйту[agr]
аллийта:оллуьйту[agr]
алло:алладо[agr]
ало:аладо[agr]
алхо:алхадо[agr]
ан:огӀу[agr]
ао:аадо[agr]
ара:ору[agr]
ардан:ардо[agr]
аржа:аьржа[agr]
аржийта:оржуьйту[agr]
аржо:аржадо[agr]
арста:ерста[agr]
арстийта:орстуьйту[agr]
арсто:арстадо[agr]
ассо:ассадо[agr]
